Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.525.090

Construction management techniques—Rules—Use—Information and training.

(1) The superintendent of public instruction, considering policy recommendations from the school facilities citizen advisory panel, shall adopt rules for appropriate use of the following construction management techniques: Value engineering, constructibility review, building commissioning, and construction management. Rules adopted under this section shall:

(a) Define each technique as it applies to school buildings;

(b) Describe the scope of work for each technique;

(c) Define the timing for implementing each technique in the construction process;

(d) Determine the appropriate size of projects for the use of each technique; and

(e) Determine standards for qualification and performance for each technique.

(2) Except as provided in rules adopted under subsection (1)(d) of this section, in allocating state moneys provided under this chapter, the superintendent of public instruction shall include in funding for each project, at the state funding assistance percentage, the cost of each of the construction management techniques listed in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) When assigning priority and allocating state funds for construction of common school facilities, the superintendent shall consider the adequacy of the construction management techniques used by a district and the compliance with the rules adopted under subsection (1) of this section.

(4) Except as provided in rules adopted under subsection (1)(d) of this section, the construction management techniques in subsection (1) of this section shall be used on each project submitted for approval by the superintendent.

(5)(a) School districts applying for state funding assistance for school facilities shall:

(i) Cause value engineering, constructibility review, and building commissioning to be performed by contract with a professional firm specializing in those construction management techniques; and

(ii) Contract or employ personnel to perform professional construction management.

(b) All recommendations from the value engineering and constructibility review construction techniques for a school project shall be presented to the school district's board of directors for acceptance or rejection. If the board of directors rejects a recommendation it shall provide a statement explaining the reasons for rejecting the recommendation and include the statement in the application for state funding assistance to the superintendent of public instruction.

(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide:

(a) An information and training program for school districts on the use of the construction management techniques; and

(b) Consulting services to districts on the benefits and best uses of these construction management techniques.

[ 2009 c 129 s 4; 2006 c 263 s 307; 1999 c 313 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—2009 c 129: See note following RCW 28A.335.230.

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Findings—1999 c 313: "The legislature finds that certain construction management techniques will improve the effectiveness of construction and operation of new school buildings, and that such techniques, including value engineering, constructibility reviews, building commissioning, and professional construction management, will provide better value to the taxpayers by reducing construction costs, improving building operations, improving the building environment for the occupants, and reducing future replacement costs." [ 1999 c 313 s 1.]